Arkansas, session 2025, HB1457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-129, concerning the submission of data
and other necessary information by public schools to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education or the Division of Career and Technical
Education is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall submit data and other information related to a public school
student's individualized education program using the uniform statewide data
collection system implemented by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education.



*TNL074*
02/11/2025 2:49:11 PM TNL074